Utah statutes.
39-6-29.   Court procedures -- Regulations by governor.

(1)  In cases subject to or brought under this chapter, before military courts, or before other military tribunals, the procedure, including elements of proof, may be prescribed by the governor by regulations.

(2)  The regulations shall, as the governor considers practicable, apply the principles of law and the rules of evidence generally recognized in the trial of criminal cases in the courts of the state. However, the regulations may not be contrary to or inconsistent with this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 210, 1988 General Session

